src/Korektor/hyph_sr.dic
.по2д3раз2у1
.по2д3рам
.по2д3ран
.по2д3рањ
.по2д3рас
.по2д3рез
.по2д3реп
.по2д3рес
.по2д3рик
.по2д3рит
.по2д3ров
.по2д3рож
.по2д3рон
.по2д3ру2ч1н
.по2д3руб
.по2д3рук
.по2д3руч2а1
.по2д3руч2и1
.по2д3упл2а1
.по2д3ус2м
.по2д3ус2н
.по2с3т2л
.по2ст3е2г1з
.по2ст3инд2у1
.по2ст3лим
.по2ст3о2н1к
.по2ст3опер
.по2т1к
.по3г2н
.по3д2нев
.по3д4јен
.по3д4јеч
.по3м2н
.по3м2њ
.по3р2в
.по3р2ђ
.по3т2кав
.по3т2кам
.по3т2кат
.по3т2ках
.под2а1
.под2в
.под2и1
.под2л
.под2љ
.под2р
.под2у1
.подв2а1
.подв2е1
.подв2и1
.подв2у1
.подвар2и1
.подвл2а1
.подвр2а1
.подвр2и1
.подј2е1
.подл2а1
.подл2е1
.подл2и1
.подл2у1
.подлак2а1
.подлиј2е1
.подљ2у1
.подн2е1
.подр2а1
.подр2е1
.подр2и1
.подр2у1
.подуп2л
.пос2т
.пост2е1
.пост2и1
.пости2н1д
.постл2и1
.постоп2е1
.потк2а1
.пр2е1
.пр2е1дувј2е1
.пр2е2д3одр2е1
.пр2е2д3ос2е1
.пр2е2д3осј2е1
.пр2е3д4вој2е1
.пр2о1
.пр2о1тив2о1
.пре2д1м
.пре2д3в
.пре2д3и1сп2и1
.пре2д3иг2р
.пре2д3ид
.пре2д3из2б
.пре2д3ист2о1
.пре2д3ист2р
.пре2д3ј
.пре2д3об2ј
.пре2д3окус
.пре2д3ос2в
.пре2д3рад
.пре2д3рат
.пре2д3рач
.пре2д3руч
.пре2д3убеђ
.пре2д3убијеђ
.пре2д3убјеђ
.пре2д3увер
.пре2д3увјер
.пре2д3увјет
.пре2д3угов
.пре2д3удар
.пре2д3упис
.пре2д3усл2о1
.пре2т1к
.пре3д4вај
.пре3д4вар
.пре3д4вес2т
.пре3д4вој2а1
.пре3д4вој2и1
.пре3д4вор
.пре3д4вос
.пре3д4јен
.пре3т2кам
.пре3т2кат
.пре3т2ках
.пред2и1
.пред2о1
.пред2р
.пред2у1
.пред3м2н
.пред3м2њ
.предв2а1
.предв2е1
.предв2о1
.предис2п
.предис2т
.предј2е1
.предод2р
.предок2у1
.предос2ј
.предр2а1
.предр2у1
.предуб2е1
.предуб2и1
.предуб2ј
.предубиј2е1
.предубј2е1
.предув2е1
.предув2ј
.предуг2о1
.предуд2а1
.предуп2и1
.предус2л
.претк2а1
.про2т1к
.про3г2н
.про3т2к2а1
.про3т2к2и1
.прот2и1
.проти2в3а2к1ц
.проти2в3от2р
.проти2в3оф
.проти2в3р
.проти2в3уд
.проти2в3ус
.против2а1
.против2у1
.р2а1
.р2а1з2а1
.р2а1з2а3т2к2а1
.р2а1зб2а1
.р2а1звр2а1
.р2а1зл2а1
.р2а1зор2а1
.р2а1ск2а1
.р2а1скл2а1
.р2а1сп2а1
.р2а1ст2а1
.р2а2з3об2а1
.р2а2з3уд2а1
.р2а3з4виј2а1
.р2а3с4клоп2а1
.р2а3с4пет2а1
.ра2ж3ђ
.ра2з2д1н
.ра2з3анал
.ра2з3б
.ра2з3в
.ра2з3г
.ра2з3г2н
.ра2з3д
.ра2з3е1
.ра2з3и1
.ра2з3ј
.ра2з3л
.ра2з3љ
.ра2з3м
.ра2з3м2р
.ра2з3н
.ра2з3њ
.ра2з3о2р1т
.ра2з3об2л
.ра2з3об2р
.ра2з3од
.ра2з3ор2у1
.ра2з3орав
.ра2з3орат
.ра2з3от
.ра2з3р
.ра2з3у2д1б
.ра2з3ув2е1
.ра2з3уд2и1
.ра2з3уз2д
.ра2з3уз2е1
.ра2з3уз2и1
.ра2з3улар
.ра2з3ум2р
.ра2с3к
.ра2с3п
.ра2с3т
.ра2с3ц
.ра2ш3ћ
.ра2ш3ч
.ра3з4ба3у1
.ра3з4бад
.ра3з4бан
.ра3з4бар
.ра3з4башур
.ра3з4бој
.ра3з4бор
.ра3з4в2е1д2е1
.ра3з4в2р1т
.ра3з4в2р1ћ
.ра3з4вал
.ра3з4вес2т
.ра3з4виг2о1
.ра3з4виј2е1
.ра3з4виј2у1
.ра3з4вит
.ра3з4вић
.ра3з4вој
.ра3з4вон
.ра3з4врат
.ра3з4враћ
.ра3з4г2р1т
.ра3з4гађ
.ра3з4ев
.ра3з4ид
.ра3з4иђ
.ра3з4из
.ра3з4иј
.ра3з4ил
.ра3з4ин
.ра3з4ир
.ра3з4ит
.ра3з4ић
.ра3з4лаг
.ра3з4лаз
.ра3з4лик
.ра3з4лич
.ра3з4лог
.ра3з4лож
.ра3з4лоз
.ра3з4мет
.ра3з4мећ
.ра3з4мрс2к
.ра3з4нат
.ра3з4ред
.ра3з4рок
.ра3з4роч
.ра3с4ка2н1д
.ра3с4как
.ра3с4кин
.ра3с4клад
.ра3с4клањ
.ра3с4клап
.ра3с4клон
.ра3с4клоп2и1
.ра3с4клоп2љ
.ра3с4кош
.ра3с4кроп
.ра3с4п1н
.ра3с4п2е1т2е1
.ра3с4пав
.ра3с4пај
.ра3с4пет2и1
.ра3с4пет2о1
.ра3с4пик2у1
.ра3с4пињ
.ра3с4плин
.ра3с4плињ
.ра3с4полож
.ра3с4пон
.ра3с4пор
.ра3с4прав
.ра3с4прем
.ра3с4р1д
.ра3с4р1ђ
.ра3с4р2е1
.ра3с4т2р1т
.ра3с4тав
.ра3с4тај
.ра3с4тан
.ра3с4тат
.ра3с4тењ
.ра3с4тил
.ра3с4тињ
.ра3с4тир
.ра3с4тис
.ра3с4тит
.ра3с4тој
.ра3с4трел
.ра3с4трет
.ра3с4трој
.ра3с4туп
.ра3с4тур
.ра3с4тућ
.ра3ш4ћењ
.ра3ш4чић
.ра4с5ту2р1ч
.раз2о1
.раз2у1
.раз3д2н2и1
.раза2т1к
.раза3г2н
.разан2а1
.разб2о1
.разбаш2у1
.разв2а1
.разв2е1
.разв2и1
.разв2о1
.разв2р
.разг2а1
.разг2р
.разл2и1
.разл2о1
.разм2е1
.разм2р1с
.разн2а1
.разр2е1
.разр2о1
.разул2а1
.рас2р
.раск2и1
.раск2л
.раск2о1
.раск2р
.раскл2о1
.раскр2о1
.расп2е1
.расп2и1
.расп2л
.расп2о1
.расп2р
.распл2и1
.распол2о1
.распр2а1
.распр2е1
.раст2е1
.раст2и1
.раст2о1
.раст2р
.раст2у1
.растр2е1
.растр2о1
.рашћ2е1
.рашч2и1
.с2у1
.с2у1пе2р3у1
.су2б3а1
.су2б3и2н1в
.су2б3ју2н1к
.су2б3л
.су2б3о2к1с
.су2б3о2р1д
.су2б3реп
.су2б3рог
.су3б4аш
.суб2и1
.суб2ј
.суб2о1
.суб2р
.субј2у1
.субр2е1
.субр2о1
.суп2е1
.суп2е2р3е1
.супе2р3а1
.супе2р3и1
.супе2р3о1
.супе3р4иор
.супери3о1
.т2р
.тр2а1
.тр2а1н2с3а1
.тра2н1с
.тран2с3в
.тран2с3е1
.тран2с3к
.тран2с3л
.тран2с3м
.тран2с3н
.тран2с3њ
.тран2с3о1
.тран2с3п
.тран2с3т
.тран2с3у1
.тран2с3ц
.тран3с4еп
.тран3с4кр2и1
.тран3с4уд
.тран3с4ум
.транск2р
.у2г1м
.у2з3б
.у2з3в
.у2з3г
.у2з3д
.у2з3и1
.у2з3иг2р
.у2з3инат
.у2з3иск2р
.у2з3ј
.у2з3л
.у2з3љ
.у2з3м
.у2з3н
.у2з3њ
.у2з3о1х2о1
.у2з3обес2т
.у2з3обијес2т
.у2з3орав
.у2з3орат
.у2з3р
.у2з3угар
.у2с3к
.у2с3п
.у2с3т2а1р2а1
.у2с3т2р1г
.у2с3т2р1к
.у2с3т2р1н
.у2с3т2р1п
.у2с3т2р1ћ
.у2с3т2р1ч
.у2с3талас
.у2с3тв2р1д
.у2с3тв2р1ђ
.у2с3тег
.у2с3тер
.у2с3тећ
.у2с3тов
.у2с3трај
.у2с3трал
.у2с3треб
.у2с3треп
.у2с3трес
.у2с3тум
.у2с3тур
.у2с3тућ
.у2с3ц
.у2ш3ћ
.у2ш3ч
.у3г2м2и1
.у3г2н
.у3з4бор
.у3з4ван
.у3з4ват
.у3з4виж
.у3з4виј2а1
.у3з4виј2е1
.у3з4виј2о1
.у3з4вој
.у3з4диц
.у3з4лан
.у3з4лат
.у3з4лим
.у3з4лит
.у3з4лић
.у3з4лиц
.у3з4лов
.у3з4лудоб
.у3з4н2е1в2е1
.у3з4н2е1вј2е1
.у3з4нак
.у3з4нач
.у3з4ниц
.у3з4нич
.у3з4ној
.у3з4р1н
.у3з4р1њ
.у3з4р2о1к2о1
.у3з4рев
.у3з4рет
.у3з4ријев
.у3з4ријет
.у3з4рок2а1
.у3з4роч
.у3з4руј
.у3с4к2о1
.у3с4как
.у3с4клад
.у3с4клађ
.у3с4куп
.у3с4пав
.у3с4пал2о1
.у3с4пе2н1т
.у3с4пев
.у3с4пел
.у3с4пем
.у3с4пет
.у3с4пех
.у3с4пеш
.у3с4пиј2а1
.у3с4пиј2е1
.у3с4пијуш
.у3с4пикуш
.у3с4пјев
.у3с4пјел
.у3с4пјем
.у3с4пјет
.у3с4пјех
.у3с4пјеш
.у3с4пон
.у3с4пор2а1
.у3с4пор2и1
.у3с4порен
.у3с4порењ
.у3с4пореч
.у3с4пособ
.у3с4прем2а1
.у3с4прем2и1
.у3с4р1д
.у3с4р1ђ
.у3с4р1ж
.у3с4р1к
.у3с4р1љ
.у3с4р1н
.у3с4р1п
.у3с4р1т
.у3с4р2а1
.у3с4р2е1
.у3с4ријед
.у4с5к2о1к2о1
.у4с5ков
.у4с5кол2е1
.у4с5ком
.у4с5коп2а1
.у4с5кор2а1
.у4с5кос2и1
.у4с5кот2р
.у4с5кош
.уз2а1
.уз2а3т2к2а1
.уз2о1
.уз2у1
.уза2т1к
.узб2о1
.узв2а1
.узв2и1
.узв2о1
.узд2и1
.узин2а1
.узис2к
.узл2а1
.узл2и1
.узл2о1
.узл2у1
.узлуд2о1
.узн2а1
.узн2е1
.узн2и1
.узн2о1
.узнев2ј
.узоб2е1
.узоб2и1
.узобиј2е1
.узор2а1
.узр2е1
.узр2и1
.узр2о1
.узр2у1
.узриј2е1
.узуг2а1
.ус2р
.ус2т
.уск2а1
.уск2л
.уск2у1
.ускл2а1
.усп2а1
.усп2е1
.усп2и1
.усп2ј
.усп2о1
.усп2р
.успиј2у1
.успик2у1
.успј2е1
.успор2е1
.успос2о1
.успр2е1
.уср2и1
.усриј2е1
.уст2а1
.уст2в
.уст2е1
.уст2о1
.уст2р
.устал2а1
.уств2р
.устр2а1
.устр2е1


.2а1б2а1
.2а1бре3а1
.2а1н2а1
.2а1н2а1б2а1
.2а1н2а1к2а1
.2а2б3л2а1
.2а2н2а1гр2а1
.2а2н2а1кл2а1
.2а2н2а1пл2а1
.2а2н2а1ст2а1
.2а2н2а1фил2а1
.2а2н3а1лф2а1
.2и1з4осе3и1
.2и1зб2и1
.2и1зв2и1
.2и1зв2и3и1
.2и1зод2и1
.2и1зос2и1
.2и1зох2и1
.2и1зра3и1
.2и1нте2р3и1
.2и1нте3р4ес2и1
.2и1ск2и1
.2и1скр2и1
.2и1сл2и1
.2и1спл2и1
.2и1ст2и1
.2и1стр2и1
.2и2з3вед2и1
.2и2з3и1
.2и3з4вал2и1
.2и3з4ваљ2и1
.2и3з4и1м2и1
.2и3з4рач2и1
.2и3с4прав2и1
.2и3с4тав2и1
.2и3с4тор2и1
.2о1бе2з3о1
.2о1бр2о1
.2о1д2о1
.2о1др2о1
.2о2д3о1н2о1
.2о3б4раз2о1
.2о3д4ран2о1
.2у1ст2у1
.2у3з4виј2у1
.2у3з4рок2у1
.2у4с5кол2у1


# TODO

2сц2р
2шц2р
3б2дењ
3б2дет
3б2дјењ
3б2дјет
3г2дегод.
3г2декад
3г2декак
3г2дјегод.
3г2дјекад
3г2дјекак
3г2миз
3г2мил
3г2миљ
3г2нај
3г2нев
3г2неж2ђ
3г2нез2д
3г2нијеж2ђ
3г2нијез2д
3г2ноз
3г2ној
3г2нос
3г2њав
3г2њев
3г2њес
3г2њет
3г2њеч
3г2њи3о1
3г2њил
3г2њиљ
3г2њит
3г2њур
3к2неж
3к2нез
3к2њиг
3к2њиж
3м2наж
3м2ног
3м2нож
3п2сик
3п2сич
3п2сов
3п2суј
3р2ђ2а1
3р2ј2е1
3с2фер
3т2мас2т
3т2му3о1
3т2мул
3т2муљ
3т2мур
3х2тев
3х2тел
3х2тењ
3х2тет2и1
3х2тјев
3х2тјел
3х2тјењ
3х2тјет2и1
3ц2мак
3ц2мач
3ц2миз
3ц2мок
3ч2лан
3ч2лањ
4р3је.
4р3јем
бд2е1
бд2ј
бдј2е1
гд2е1
гд2ј
гдег2о1
гдек2а1
гдј2е1
гдјег2о1
гдјек2а1
гм2и1
гн2а1
гн2е1
гн2и1
гн2о1
гниј2е1
гњ2а1
гњ2е1
гњ2и1
гњ2у1
кн2е1
књ2и1
мн2а1
мн2о1
н2е1
н2и1
не2г1д
не3г2де.
не3г2дје.
негд2е1
негд2ј
негдј2е1
ни2г1д
ни3г2де.
ни3г2дје.
нигд2е1
нигд2ј
нигдј2е1
пс2и1
пс2о1
пс2у1
сф2е1
тм2а1
тм2у1
хт2е1
хт2ј
хтј2е1
цм2а1
цм2и1
цм2о1
чл2а1
